Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0636.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 104. (1) "Affiliate" means, if used with respect to a specified person other than a natural person, a person controlling or controlled by that specified person, or a person controlled by a person that also controls the specified person. (2) "BIDCO" means a business and industrial development company licensed under this act. The term includes a business development enterprise. (3) "Board of the Michigan strategic fund" means either of the following, as applicable: (a) Until the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the board of directors of the Michigan strategic fund under section 5 of former 1984 PA 270. (b) Beginning on the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the bureau. (4) "Bureau" means the bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act. (5) (3) "Business development enterprise" means a business and industrial development company that meets all of the following: (a) Has as part of its business plan the objective of providing public benefit. (b) Is licensed under this act. (c) Is designated as a qualified business development enterprise by the Michigan strategic fund under section 304. (6) (4) "Business firm" means a person that transacts business on a regular and continual basis, or a person that proposes to transact business on a regular and continual basis. (7) (5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the office of financial and insurance regulation in the department of licensing and regulatory affairs.director of the department of insurance and financial services. (8) (6) "Control" means, if used with respect to a specified person, the power to direct or cause the direction of, directly or indirectly through 1 or more intermediaries, the management and policies of that specified person, whether by contract, other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise. A natural person is not considered to control a person solely because he or she is a director, officer, manager, or employee of that person. A person that, directly or indirectly, has the power to vote or direct the voting of 20% or more of the total ownership vote is rebuttably presumed to control that entity. (9) (7) "Controlling person" means, if used with respect to a specified person, a person that controls that specified person, directly or indirectly through 1 or more intermediaries. Sec. 105. (1) "Incorporating statute" means the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1101 to 450.2098, the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192, or the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4101 to 450.5200. (2) "Insolvent" means a licensee that ceases to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, that cannot pay its debts as they become due, or whose liabilities exceed its assets. (3) "Interests of the licensee" includes the interests of shareholders of a licensee organized as a Michigan corporation and members of a licensee organized as a Michigan limited liability company. (4) "License" means a license issued under this act authorizing a Michigan corporation or Michigan limited liability company to transact business as a BIDCO. The term includes a BIDCO license issued to a business development enterprise. (5) "Licensee" means a Michigan corporation or Michigan limited liability company that holds a license under this act. (6) "Manager" means a person designated by the members of a Michigan limited liability company to manage the limited liability company as provided in its articles of organization or an operating agreement. (7) "Member" means a person that has an ownership interest in a BIDCO organized as a Michigan limited liability company. (8) "Michigan corporation" means a corporation incorporated under the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1101 to 450.2098, or the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192. (9) "Michigan limited liability company" means a limited liability company organized under the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4101 to 450.5200. (10) "Michigan nonprofit corporation" means a corporation incorporated under the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192. (11) "Michigan strategic fund" means either of the following, as applicable: (a) Until the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the Michigan strategic fund as described in the Michigan strategic fund act, former 1984 PA 270. , MCL 125.2001 to 125.2094. (b) Beginning on the effective date of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act, the bureau. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.